Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5070.
people of the state of michigan enact: 1 2 3 part 1 line-item appropriations FOR FISCAL YEAR 2025-2026 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 Sec. 101. There is appropriated for the various state departments and agencies, the judicial branch, and the legislative branch described in this part for the fiscal year ending September 30, 2026, from the following funds: APPROPRIATION SUMMARY GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 78,000,000 Interdepartmental grant revenues: Total interdepartmental grants and intradepartmental transfers 0 ADJUSTED GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 78,000,000 Federal revenues: Social security act, temporary assistance for needy families 20,000,000 Special revenue funds: Total local revenues 0 Total private revenues 0 Total other state restricted revenues 10,000,000 State general fund/general purpose $ 48,000,000 Sec. 102. DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES (1) APPROPRIATION SUMMARY GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 78,000,000 Interdepartmental grant revenues: Total interdepartmental grants and intradepartmental transfers 0 ADJUSTED GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 78,000,000 Federal revenues: 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 Social security act, temporary assistance for needy families 20,000,000 Special revenue funds: Total local revenues 0 Total private revenues 0 Total other state restricted revenues 10,000,000 State general fund/general purpose $ 48,000,000 (2) PUBLIC ASSISTANCE Prenatal and infant support program $ 78,000,000 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 78,000,000 Appropriated from: Federal revenues: Social security act, temporary assistance for needy families 20,000,000 Special revenue funds: Total other state restricted revenues 10,000,000 State general fund/general purpose $ 48,000,000 PART 2 PROVISIONS CONCERNING APPROPRIATIONS FOR FISCAL YEAR 2025-2026 GENERAL SECTIONS Sec. 201. In accordance with section 30 of article IX of the state constitution of 1963, for the fiscal year ending September 30, 2026, total state spending from state sources under part 1 is $58,000,000.00 and total state spending from state sources under part 1 to be paid to local units of government is $0.00. Sec. 202. The appropriations under this part and part 1 are 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 subject to the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1101 to 18.1594. DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES Sec. 301. Funds appropriated in part 1 for prenatal and infant support program must be used to expand the Rx Kids program. Sec. 302. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for prenatal and infant support program, the department shall allocate $20,000,000.00 of TANF revenue for programs that are intended to improve the economic stability of households with very young children. (2) In allocating the funds referenced in subsection (1), the department shall give preference to programs that demonstrate the following: (a) Effectiveness in improving the economic stability of households with pregnant women at a minimum of 20 weeks gestation, and with young children. (b) Partnerships with local health care providers and nonprofit human service agencies that provide for improved maternal and infant health outcomes. (c) Compliance with TANF requirements established by the Administration for Children and Families within the United States Department of Health and Human Services. (3) By September 30 of the current fiscal year, the department, through agreements with contracted implementing agencies, shall report to the senate and house appropriations subcommittees on health and human services, the senate and house fiscal agencies, the senate and house policy offices, and the state budget office information through June 30 of the current fiscal 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 year on the aggregated demographic data of all program recipients, regardless of underlying funding source. The report must include, but is not limited to, aggregated recipient data from contracted implementing agencies, with each contracted implementing agency providing the age, race, ethnicity, Hispanic or Latino origin, federal poverty level, funding source, and zip codes of all program recipients.